District of Columbia statutes.
4-754.51

Establishment of Office of Shelter Monitoring.

There is established within the Department of Human Services an Office of Shelter Monitoring to monitor shelters and services provided by the District and its contractors to clients who are homeless.

History

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 27a
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-296, § 2(i), 54 DCR 1097

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-751.01.